District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-114.01

Implementation.

Repealed.

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 1501, 47 DCR 2647
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 7024, 55 DCR 7598
Short title: Section 7024 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle J of title VII of the act may be cited as the “Elimination of Subject-to-Appropriations Contingencies Amendment Act of 2008”.